test/src/gt-norm-yamls/myv-tests-noun_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - псака: # Ordinary nouns - full paradigm including MWN
    псака+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: псака
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: псакань
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: псакань
    псака+N+Sg+Abl+Indef: псакадо
    псака+N+Pl+Abl+Indef: псакадо
    псака+N+Sg+DatCx+Indef: псаканень
    псака+N+Pl+DatCx+Indef: псаканень
    псака+N+Sg+Com+Indef: псаканек
    псака+N+Pl+Com+Indef: псаканек
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: псакавтомо
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: псакавтомо
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Indef: псакашка
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Indef: псакашка
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Indef: псакасо
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Indef: псакасо
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Indef: псакасто
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Indef: псакасто
    псака+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: псакас
    псака+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: псакас
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Indef: псакава
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Indef: псакава
    псака+N+Sg+Tra+Indef: псакакс
    псака+N+Pl+Tra+Indef: псакакс
    псака+N+Sg+Lat+Indef: псакав
    псака+N+Pl+Lat+Indef: псакав
    псака+N+Sg+TempCx+Indef: псакане
    псака+N+Pl+TempCx+Indef: псакане
    псака+N+Sg+Nom+Px1Sg: псакам
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px1Sg: [псакам, псакан]
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px1Sg: псакан
    псака+N+Sg+Abl+Px1Sg: псакадон
    псака+N+Pl+Abl+Px1Sg: псакадон
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px1Sg: псакавтомон
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px1Sg: псакавтомон
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Sg: псакашкан
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Sg: псакашкан
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Sg: псакасон
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Sg: псакасон
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg: псакастон
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg: псакастон
    псака+N+Sg+Ill+Px1Sg: псаказон
    псака+N+Pl+Ill+Px1Sg: псаказон
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg: псакаван
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg: псакаван
    псака+N+Sg+Tra+Px1Sg: псакаксон
    псака+N+Pl+Tra+Px1Sg: псакаксон
    псака+N+Sg+Nom+Px2Sg: псакат
    псака+N+Pl+Nom+Px2Sg: псакат
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg: псакат
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg: псакат
    псака+N+Sg+Abl+Px2Sg: псакадот
    псака+N+Pl+Abl+Px2Sg: псакадот
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px2Sg: псакавтомот
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px2Sg: псакавтомот
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Sg: псакашкат
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Sg: псакашкат
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px2Sg: псакасот
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px2Sg: псакасот
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px2Sg: псакастот
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px2Sg: псакастот
    псака+N+Sg+Ill+Px2Sg: псаказот
    псака+N+Pl+Ill+Px2Sg: псаказот
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Px2Sg: псакават
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Px2Sg: псакават
    псака+N+Sg+Tra+Px2Sg: псакаксот
    псака+N+Pl+Tra+Px2Sg: псакаксот
    псака+N+Sg+Nom+Px3Sg: псаказо
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg: псаканзо
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg: псаканзо
    псака+N+Sg+Abl+Px3Sg: псакадонзо
    псака+N+Pl+Abl+Px3Sg: псакадонзо
    псака+N+Sg+DatCx+Px3Sg: псаканстэнь
    псака+N+Pl+DatCx+Px3Sg: псаканстэнь
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg: псакавтомонзо
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg: псакавтомонзо
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg: псакашканзо
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg: псакашканзо
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg: псакасонзо
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg: псакасонзо
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg: псакастонзо
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg: псакастонзо
    псака+N+Sg+Ill+Px3Sg: псаказонзо
    псака+N+Pl+Ill+Px3Sg: псаказонзо
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Px3Sg: псакаванзо
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Px3Sg: псакаванзо
    псака+N+Sg+Tra+Px3Sg: псакаксонзо
    псака+N+Pl+Tra+Px3Sg: псакаксонзо
    псака+N+Sg+Nom+Px1Pl: псаканок
    псака+N+Pl+Nom+Px1Pl: псаканок
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px1Pl: псаканок
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px1Pl: псаканок
    псака+N+Sg+Abl+Px1Pl: псакадонок
    псака+N+Pl+Abl+Px1Pl: псакадонок
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px1Pl: псакавтомонок
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px1Pl: псакавтомонок
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl: псакашканок
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl: псакашканок
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl: псакасонок
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl: псакасонок
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl: псакастонок
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl: псакастонок
    псака+N+Sg+Ill+Px1Pl: псаказонок
    псака+N+Pl+Ill+Px1Pl: псаказонок
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Pl: псакаванок
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Pl: псакаванок
    псака+N+Sg+Tra+Px1Pl: псакаксонок
    псака+N+Pl+Tra+Px1Pl: псакаксонок
    псака+N+Sg+Nom+Px2Pl: псаканк
    псака+N+Pl+Nom+Px2Pl: псаканк
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Pl: псаканк
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Pl: псаканк
    псака+N+Sg+Abl+Px2Pl: псакадонк
    псака+N+Pl+Abl+Px2Pl: псакадонк
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px2Pl: псакавтомонк
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px2Pl: псакавтомонк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Pl: псакашканк
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Pl: псакашканк
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px2Pl: псакасонк
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px2Pl: псакасонк
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px2Pl: псакастонк
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px2Pl: псакастонк
    псака+N+Sg+Ill+Px2Pl: псаказонк
    псака+N+Pl+Ill+Px2Pl: псаказонк
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Px2Pl: псакаванк
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Px2Pl: псакаванк
    псака+N+Sg+Tra+Px2Pl: псакаксонк
    псака+N+Pl+Tra+Px2Pl: псакаксонк
    псака+N+Sg+Nom+Px3Pl: псакаст
    псака+N+Pl+Nom+Px3Pl: псакаст
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Pl: псакаст
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Pl: псакаст
    псака+N+Sg+Abl+Px3Pl: псакадост
    псака+N+Pl+Abl+Px3Pl: псакадост
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Pl: псакавтомост
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Pl: псакавтомост
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Pl: псакашкаст
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Pl: псакашкаст
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Pl: псакасост
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Pl: псакасост
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Pl: псакастост
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Pl: псакастост
    псака+N+Sg+Ill+Px3Pl: псаказост
    псака+N+Pl+Ill+Px3Pl: псаказост
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Px3Pl: псакаваст
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Px3Pl: псакаваст
    псака+N+Sg+Tra+Px3Pl: псакаксост
    псака+N+Pl+Tra+Px3Pl: псакаксост
    псака+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: псакат
    псака+N+Pl+Nom+Px1Sg: псакан
    псака+N+Pl+Nom+Px3Sg: псаканзо
    псака+N+Sg+Nom+Def: псакась
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Def: псаканть
    псака+N+Sg+DatCx+Def: псакантень
    псака+N+Sg+Abl+Def: псакадонть
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Def: псакасонть
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Def: псакастонть
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Def: псакаванть
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Def: псакавтомонть
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Def: псакашканть
    псака+N+Sg+Tra+Def: псакаксонть
    псака+N+Pl+Nom+Def: псакатне
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Def: псакатнень
    псака+N+Pl+DatCx+Def: псакатненень
    псака+N+Pl+Abl+Def: псакатнеде
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Def: псакатнесэ
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Def: псакатнестэ
    псака+N+Pl+Ill+Def: псакатнес
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Def: псакатнева
    псака+N+Pl+Tra+Def: псакатнекс
    псака+N+Pl+Lat+Def: псакатнев
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Def: псакатневтеме
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Def: псакатнешка
    псака+N+Pl+Com+Def: псакатненек
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef: псаканзодо
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Indef: псаканзодо
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef: псаканзодо
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Indef: псаканзодо
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef: псаканзокс
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Indef: псаканзокс
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef: псаканзокс
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Indef: псаканзокс
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def: псаканзось
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def: псаканзось
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def: псаканзонть
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def: псаканзонть
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def: псаканзонтень
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def: псаканзонтень
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def: псаканзодонть
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def: псаканзодонть
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def: псаканзосонть
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def: псаканзосонть
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def: псаканзостонть
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def: псаканзостонть
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def: псаканзованть
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def: псаканзованть
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def: псаканзовтомонть
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def: псаканзовтомонть
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def: псаканзошканть
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def: псаканзошканть
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def: псаканзоксонть
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def: псаканзоксонть
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def: псаканзотне
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def: псаканзотне
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def: псаканзотнень
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def: псаканзотнень
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def: псаканзотненень
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def: псаканзотненень
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def: псаканзотнеде
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def: псаканзотнеде
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def: псаканзотнесэ
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def: псаканзотнесэ
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def: псаканзотнестэ
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def: псаканзотнестэ
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def: псаканзотнес
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def: псаканзотнес
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Def: псаканзотнева
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Def: псаканзотнева
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: псаканзотнекс
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: псаканзотнекс
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def: псаканзотнев
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def: псаканзотнев
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def: псаканзотневтеме
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def: псаканзотневтеме
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def: псаканзотнешка
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def: псаканзотнешка
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def: псаканзотненек
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def: псаканзотненек
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef: псакавтомонзодо
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Indef: псакавтомонзодо
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef: псакавтомонзодо
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Indef: псакавтомонзодо
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef: псакавтомонзокс
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Indef: псакавтомонзокс
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef: псакавтомонзокс
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Indef: псакавтомонзокс
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def: псакавтомонзось
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def: псакавтомонзось
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def: псакавтомонзонть
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def: псакавтомонзонть
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def: псакавтомонзонтень
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def: псакавтомонзонтень
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def: псакавтомонзодонть
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def: псакавтомонзодонть
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def: псакавтомонзосонть
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def: псакавтомонзосонть
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def: псакавтомонзостонть
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def: псакавтомонзостонть
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def: псакавтомонзованть
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def: псакавтомонзованть
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def: псакавтомонзовтомонть
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def: псакавтомонзовтомонть
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def: псакавтомонзошканть
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def: псакавтомонзошканть
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def: псакавтомонзоксонть
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def: псакавтомонзоксонть
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def: псакавтомонзотне
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def: псакавтомонзотне
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def: псакавтомонзотнень
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def: псакавтомонзотнень
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def: псакавтомонзотненень
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def: псакавтомонзотненень
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def: псакавтомонзотнеде
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def: псакавтомонзотнеде
